New York, session 2025-2026, S7742.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1202-gg of the tax law, as added by chapter 371 of 2 the laws of 2020, is renumbered section 1202-gg-2. 3 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 371 of the laws of 2020 amending the tax law 4 relating to authorizing the town of Newburgh to impose a hotel and motel 5 tax, as amended by chapter 322 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 6 as follows: 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 8 deemed repealed on December 23, [2025] 2027. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11774-03-5